Utah statutes.
32A-9-102 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Application and renewal requirements.

(1)  A person seeking a warehousing license under this chapter shall file a written application with the department, in a form prescribed by the department. The application shall be accompanied by:

(a)  a nonrefundable $250 application fee;

(b)  an initial license fee of $750, which is refundable if a license is not granted;

(c)  written consent of the local authority;

(d)  a copy of the applicant's current business license;

(e)  a bond as specified by Section 32A-9-105;

(f)  evidence that the applicant is carrying public liability insurance in an amount and form satisfactory to the department;

(g)  a floor plan of the applicant's warehouse, including the area in which the applicant proposes that liquor be stored;

(h)  a signed consent form stating that the licensee will permit any authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law enforcement officer unrestricted right to enter the warehouse premises;

(i)  in the case of an applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company, proper verification evidencing that the person or persons signing the warehousing license application are authorized to so act on behalf of the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company; and

(j)  any other documents and evidence the department may require by rule or policy to allow complete evaluation of the application.

(2) (a)  All warehousing licenses expire on December 31 of each year.

(b)  Persons desiring to renew their license shall submit a renewal fee of $1,000 and a completed renewal application to the department no later than November 30 of the year the license expires.

(c)  Failure to meet the renewal requirements results in an automatic forfeiture of the license effective on the date the existing license expires.

(d)  Renewal applications shall be in a form prescribed by the department.

(3)  To ensure compliance with Subsection 32A-9-106(9), the commission may suspend or revoke a warehousing license if a warehousing licensee does not immediately notify the department of any change in:

(a)  ownership of the licensee;

(b)  for a corporate owner, the:

(i)  corporate officers or directors; or

(ii)  shareholders holding at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the corporation; or

(c)  for a limited liability company:

(i)  managers; or

(ii)  members owning at least 20% of the limited liability company.

